Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5939.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28-14-2.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-14 entitled "Payment
of Wages" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-14-2.2. Frequency of payment.
(a) Except as provided in §§ 28-14-4, and 28-14-5 and subsections (b) and (c) of this
section, every employee other than employees of the state and its political subdivisions and of
religious, literary, or charitable corporations, municipal governments, and nonprofit organizations
with less than twenty-five (25) employees shall be paid weekly all due wages from his or her their
employer, except those employees whose compensation is fixed at a biweekly, semi-monthly,
monthly, or yearly rate.
(b) The director may, upon written petition showing good and sufficient reason, permit
employers in the state of Rhode Island whose average payroll exceeds two hundred percent (200%)
of the state minimum wage as defined in § 28-12-3 to pay wages less frequently than weekly
provided:
(1) The employer makes payment of wages regularly on a predesignated date no less than
twice per month;
(2) The employer provides proof of a surety bond or other sufficient demonstration of
security in the amount of the highest biweekly payroll exposure in the preceding year for the
employees subject to the petition; and

(3) If the involved employees are subject to collective bargaining, the employer provides
the written consent of the collective bargaining representative for all involved employees.
(c) The director may, upon written petition showing good and sufficient reason, permit
employers in the state of Rhode Island whose average payroll is less than two hundred percent
(200%) of the state minimum wage as defined in § 28-12-3 to pay wages and salaries of their
employees less frequently than weekly provided:
(1) The employer has supplied the department with the following information:
(i) The method through which wages shall be paid;
(ii) The requested frequency of payment;
(iii) The employer’s designated payday(s);
(iv) The classification of the employees involved;
(v) The salary range of the employees involved; and
(vi) The employer’s federal identification number;
(2) The employer makes payment of wages regularly on a predesignated date no less than
twice per month;
(3) The employer has no history of wage and hour violations;
(4) The employer provides proof of a surety bond or other sufficient demonstration of
security in the amount of the highest biweekly payroll exposure in the preceding year for the
employees subject to the petition; and
(5) If the involved employees are subject to collective bargaining, the employer provides
the written consent of the collective bargaining representative for all involved employees.
(d) If the director approves a written petition under subsection (b) or (c), the permission is
valid for an indefinite period of time, provided that:
(1) Payroll is regularly satisfied on the designated payday;
(2) The information provided by the employer to substantiate its request does not change;
and
(3) The employer remains in compliance with all other state labor laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002060
========
LC002060 - Page 2 of 3